Mississippi statutes. Title 59. Ports, Harbors, Landings and Watercraft
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 59-7-1.
Payment of portion of state ad valorem taxes collected by certain counties into county depository.

In all counties in the State of Mississippi in which there is located a harbor or port of entry where commodities are exported to foreign nations, and where there is maintained a channel and/or harbor or port to a depth of not less than twenty feet, the tax collector of said county shall pay into the county depository, the amount of two mills of all ad valorem taxes due by said county to the State of Mississippi which is collected by the tax collector of said county or which may be collected by any other lawful taxing agency of such county and state for such county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7565; Laws, 1932, ch. 269; Laws, 1968, ch. 361, § 11, eff from and after January 1, 1972.

§ 59-7-3.
Port fund.

The board of supervisors of the county or counties designated in section 59-7-1 shall place all money so retained and collected in the county depository in the county to the credit of a fund which shall be known as a port fund, and such fund so deposited shall be used only for the maintenance, construction, promotion, advertising and general advancement of the port of entry so located in said county, and the fund shall be expended by the board of supervisors of the county for the maintenance, construction, promotion, advertisement, and general advancement of any port or ports of entry in said county or counties and the payment of any outstanding bonds and interest thereon heretofore or hereafter issued for port purposes by any municipality in which said port or ports are located as hereinafter provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7566; Laws, 1932, ch. 269; Laws, 1935, ch. 66.

§ 59-7-5.
Authorization of municipal harbor improvements.

The authorities of any municipality in which there is situated and located, in whole or in part, a port of entry through which commodities are imported and exported to foreign nations, which maintains a channel and/or harbor to a depth of not less than twenty feet, are hereby given the authority to engage in, through the agency hereinafter provided and designated and such other agencies as hereinafter may be provided by law, work of internal improvement, or promoting, developing, constructing, maintaining, and operating harbors or seaports within the state and its jurisdiction, acting through the commission hereinafter provided for, shall have the power to acquire, purchase, install, lease, construct, own, hold, maintain, equip, use, control and operate at seaports, wharves, piers, docks, quays, grain elevators, cotton compresses, warehouses and other water and rail terminals and other structures, and facilities needful for the convenient use of the same in the aid of commerce including the dredging of approaches thereto, provided that such work on improvements and facilities shall always be and remain under the management and control of said municipality through the governing agency hereinafter provided and designated, or other such governing agency or agencies as hereinafter may be provided by law. The entire cost of the said municipality of engaging in such work or development shall not exceed the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7567; Laws, 1932, ch. 269.

§ 59-7-7.
Operation of improvements; disposition of revenues; annual report.

All improvements, constructed by and under the provisions of this article, shall be operated under the control of a port commission as provided in Chapter 1 of this title. All revenue created or collected from the use of said docks, harbors and facilities of whatsoever nature shall be paid into the city treasury of said port of entry to be used exclusively for the advancement, development and advertising of said port in whatsoever method or manner said port commissioners shall see fit, and all revenue provided for in this article, either by levy or collection from said docks and harbor facilities may be paid to the retirement of any bonds heretofore issued or hereafter issued by any such municipality for wharf construction or other port purposes, regardless of the time of issuance of such bonds. Said port commissioners of said port of entry shall make an annual report to the governor of the State of Mississippi, to the state legislature, to the board of supervisors, and to the municipal governing authorities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7568; Laws, 1932, ch. 269; Laws, 1935, ch. 66; Laws, 1970, ch. 406, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1970.

§ 59-7-9.
Expenditure of funds arising under article; bonds generally.

All monies accruing by virtue of this article, either through revenues, tariffs, or bonds, or through other sources, shall be expended at the direction of the port commission appointed for any port of entry, as designated herein, and any bond issue hereunder by any municipality, coming under the provisions of this article, shall be exclusive of any and all other bonds issued by said municipality, and the same shall not be limited as now provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7569; Laws, 1932, ch. 269.

§ 59-7-11.
Authorization for issuance of bonds generally.

The authorities of any municipality in which there is situated and located in whole or in part a port of entry through which commodities are imported or exported are hereby given authority to issue bonds or other obligations to construct all needful improvement or improvements in harbors within their corporate limits, and including the deepening of any part of said harbor or extending, enlarging and adding to the same by dredging of any part of said harbor or extending inland, to acquire, construct, repair and improve public wharves and docks of said municipality in connection with said harbor; to own, construct, lease and maintain sheds, warehouses, elevators, compresses and other works of public improvement, including roadways or rail trackage necessary or useful for such port, harbor and/or docks and wharf purposes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7570; Laws, 1932, ch. 269.

§ 59-7-13.
Details of bonds; supplemental powers and authorizations for issuance of bonds.

All of the bonds issued pursuant to the authority set forth in Section 59-7-11 shall be lithographed or engraved, and printed in two (2) or more colors, to prevent counterfeiting, and shall be in sums not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) each, and shall be registered as issued, be numbered in a regular series from one (1) upward, be signed by the mayor and countersigned by the clerk who shall impress the municipal seal upon each bond as it is issued; and every bond shall specify on its face the purpose for which it was issued; and the total amount authorized to be issued and each shall be payable to bearer. All such monies above referred to, as retained by the boards of supervisors, shall first be appropriated by the boards of supervisors for the payment of interest and sinking fund for any and all bonds issued by the municipality for port purposes and the balance, if any, shall be expended by the boards of supervisors by and under the direction and advice of the port commission of said municipality. However, in case there is not sufficient money to pay the interest and sinking funds on said bonds the corporate authorities of municipalities issuing said bonds shall levy annually a special levy to be used exclusively in paying the interest on each bond and bonds maturing within the year providing a sinking fund for the redemption of the bonds issued. However, such tax levy shall not be made by municipalities to pay bonds, nor the interest thereon, issued under article 7 of this chapter.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, bonds referred to hereinabove may be issued pursuant to the supplemental powers and authorizations conferred by the provisions of the Registered Bond Act, being Sections 31-21-1 through 31-21-7.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7571; Laws, 1932, ch. 269; Laws, 1935, ch. 66; Laws, 1983, ch. 494, § 28, eff from and after passage (approved April 11, 1983).

§ 59-7-15.
Conduct of bond issue election generally.

Before issuing the bonds authorized by Section 59-7-11, the corporate authorities shall by resolution spread upon the minutes, declare their intention of issuing said bonds, fixing in said resolution the maximum amount thereof, and the purpose for which they are issued and where an election is required shall fix in such resolution a date upon which an election shall be held in said municipality, of which not less than three weeks notice shall be given by the clerk by a notice published in a newspaper published in said municipality once a week for three weeks preceding said election at three public places in said municipality. Such election shall be held as far as practicable, as other elections are held in municipalities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7572; Laws, 1932, ch. 269.

§ 59-7-17.
Qualifications of electors; form and marking of ballots; issuance of bonds without election.

At an election required by Section 59-7-15, all qualified electors of said municipality may vote, and the ballots used shall have printed thereon a brief statement of the amount and purpose of the proposed bond issue and the words, “For the bond issue”, and the words, “Against the bond issue”, and the voter shall vote by placing a cross (X) opposite his choice of the proposition. In cities of less than twelve thousand inhabitants, when the amount to be issued is not more than thirty thousand dollars the corporate authorities shall publish the resolution in some newspaper published in the county for three full consecutive weeks as herein provided, declaring their intention to issue said bonds, giving the day and date upon which said bonds are to be issued and if twenty per cent of the qualified electors of the municipality file a written protest against the issuance of said bonds, on or before said date, then an election shall be had as herein provided, and if no protest shall be filed, said bonds shall be issued without an election.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7573; Laws, 1932, ch. 269.

§ 59-7-19.
Issuance of bonds; maturities, interest, and execution; payment of principal and interest on bonds.

Should the election provided for in Sections 59-7-15 and 59-7-17 result in favor of the issuance of the bonds, the corporate authorities may issue said bonds, either in whole or in part within one (1) year after the date of such election or within (1) year after final favorable determination of any litigation affecting such bonds, as may be deemed best, and should the bonds be issued by the municipalities without an election therefor as provided. All bonds shall mature annually, with all maturities not longer than twenty (20) years, with not less than one-fiftieth (1/50) of the total issue to mature each year during the first five (5) years of the life of said bonds, and not less than one-twenty-fifth (1/25) of the said total issue to mature annually during the succeeding ten-year period of the life of said bonds, and the remainder to be divided into approximately equal payments, one (1) payment to mature during each year of the remaining life of the bonds. Said bonds shall not bear a greater rate of interest than that allowed in Section 75-17-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, payable semiannually, the denomination and form and place of payment to be fixed in the ordinance of the corporate authorities issuing said bonds, and they shall be prepared and signed by the mayor and clerk of said municipality with the seal of the municipality affixed thereto, but the coupons may only bear a facsimile signature of such mayor and clerk. Such bonds when issued, shall constitute a lien on all the taxable property in such municipality and county and the corporate authorities shall annually levy a special tax on all such property sufficient to pay the principal and interest of such bonds as the same falls due, if there not be sufficient funds provided herein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7574; Laws, 1932, ch. 269; Laws, 1981, ch. 462, § 15; Laws, 1982, ch. 434, § 28; Laws, 1983, ch. 541, § 36, eff from and after passage (approved April 25, 1983).

§ 59-7-21.
Disposition of proceeds from bonds; penalty for diversion; guarantee of payment.

The proceeds of any bonds issued under the authority of this article shall be placed in the municipal treasury or depository, if there be one, as a special fund and shall be used for no other purpose than the purpose set forth in the original resolution of the corporate authorities of such municipality, and any officer diverting or assisting to divert any such funds to any other purpose than the purpose originally set forth in said resolution of the corporate authorities of said municipality shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and punishable accordingly, and shall be liable both personally and on his official bond for such diversion. Nothing in this article shall be construed as a guarantee on the part of the State of Mississippi to pay the interest or principal on any bonds issued under this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7575; Laws, 1932, ch. 269.